Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Fossil Fuel and Hydrocarbon Research

152A.210.
Definition. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152A.220.
Establishment of research program. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152A.230.
Duties of secretary. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152A.240.
Powers of secretary. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152A.250.
Office and employees. [Repealed.]

152A.260.
Study grants. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152A.270.
Interstate agreements. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152A.280.
Extension of program into state schools. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]